Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.763

End of participation in chapter 41.28 RCW—Newly elected or appointed judges.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2007, any newly elected or appointed district court judge or municipal court judge, who is not eligible for membership under chapter 41.28 RCW, shall be subject to the benefit and contribution provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2007, any newly elected or appointed district court judge, or municipal court judge, who has not previously established membership in this system, and who is not eligible for membership under chapter 41.28 RCW, shall become a member of plan 2 and shall be subject to the benefit and contribution provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

[ 2006 c 189 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.